Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1581.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; peace officer training equipment fund; simulators; pepper ball equipment; exemption; intent A. The following amounts are appropriated from the peace officer training equipment fund established by section 41-1731, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to be distributed to the following recipients for the following purposes: 1. $328,000 to the Flagstaff police department for a public safety training simulator. 2. $660,000 to the Glendale police department for two public safety training simulators. 3. $328,000 to the Yavapai county sheriff's office for a public safety training simulator. B. The following amounts are appropriated from the peace officer training equipment fund established by section 41-1731, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to be distributed to the following recipients for pepper ball equipment: 1. $53,645 to the Navajo county sheriff's office. 2. $20,850 to the Page police department. 3. $24,624 to the Benson police department. 4. $121,434 to the Yuma police department. 5. $103,487 to the Queen Creek police department. 6. $30,337 to the Maricopa police department. 7. $200,000 to the Tucson police department. 8. $68,035 to the Apache county sheriff's office. 9. $7,495 to the Show Low police department. 10. $18,920 to the Pinetop-Lakeside police department. 11. $25,412 to the Tempe police department. 12. $34,323 to the Douglas police department. 13. $22,474 to the Nogales police department. 14. $12,735 to the Coconino county sheriff's office. 15. $33,311 to the Clarkdale police department. 16. $87,651 to the Bullhead City police department. 17. $39,049 to the La Paz county sheriff's office. 18. $97,319 to the Flagstaff police department. 19. $32,867 to the St. Johns police department. 20. $52,879 to the Surprise police department. 21. $39,574 to the Tonto Apache police department. 22. $54,600 to the Arizona state university police department. 23. $36,224 to the Yuma county sheriff's office. 24. $74,828 to the Goodyear police department. 25. $18,758 to the San Luis police department. 26. $63,080 to the Pinal county sheriff's office. 27. $13,807 to the Graham county sheriff's office. 28. $16,562 to the Kingman police department. 29. $19,118 to the Huachuca City police department. C. The appropriations made in subsections A and B of this section are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations. D. The legislature intends that the training simulators allocated pursuant to subsection A of this section be used to teach de-escalation tactics, including dealing with persons who are deaf and the hard of hearing, persons with autism and persons with mental illness.